Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 5

Pharmaceutical Connection Program

71-5-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of finance and administration; and

“Manufacturer-sponsored prescription drug assistance program” means a program offered by a pharmaceutical manufacturer, through which the manufacturer provides a drug or drugs to eligible persons at no charge or at a discounted cost.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-502. Establishment of pharmaceutical connection program.

The Tennessee pharmaceutical connection program is established to help the uninsured in accessing all manufacturer-sponsored prescription drug assistance programs and other programs for which they may qualify, including, but not limited to, medicare part D prescription drug coverage.

The department shall administer the program and shall utilize a toll-free number and website as the point of contact for those eligible to participate in the program.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-503. Assistance by department of finance and administration — Volunteer assistance — Assistance in development of program.

The department shall provide assistance as authorized by this part. The assistance provided shall include:

Assisting persons in identifying and accessing manufacturer-sponsored prescription drug assistance programs for which those persons are or may be eligible;

Assisting persons in applying for manufacturer-sponsored prescription drug assistance programs for which those persons are or may be eligible;

Disseminating information about available programs that can provide assistance with obtaining prescription drugs at a lower cost; and

Assisting persons in comparing medicare part D drug plans, and in applying for the plan best suited to those person's needs.

The department may seek and receive voluntary moneys, including grants and gifts, to assist with the implementation of the Tennessee pharmaceutical connection program.

The department shall include, within the development of the program, the assistance of foundations, independent and chain community pharmacists, volunteers, state agencies, community groups, area agencies on aging, corporations, hospitals, physicians, and any other entity that can further the intent of the program.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-504. Notification about program to pharmaceutical companies — Opportunity for companies to submit information about assistance programs offered by companies.

The department shall notify pharmaceutical companies doing business in Tennessee of the Tennessee pharmaceutical connection program, and shall offer pharmaceutical companies the opportunity to submit information to the department about any pharmaceutical assistance programs the pharmaceutical companies offer, the drugs covered by such programs, and all information required for application to the programs.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-505. Strategies to improve access to prescription drugs.

The department may implement additional strategies, subject to available resources, to improve access to prescription drugs for persons who have no or inadequate health insurance, or other resources for the purchase of medically necessary prescription drugs.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-506. Annual report.

The department shall prepare and submit an annual report on the operations of the Tennessee pharmaceutical connection program to the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.

71-5-507. Entitlement not created by program.

The program established in this part is not, nor does it any way create, an entitlement.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 5.